Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
76-3101
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-3101 to 76-3112 shall be known
and may be cited as the Private Transfer Fee Obligation Act.

Laws 2011, LB26, § 1.
March 11, 2011